Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0453.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1164. (1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of each school district and intermediate school district and board of directors of each public school academy shall ensure that 1 unit of instruction of age- and grade-appropriate instruction concerning Black history is incorporated into the history curriculum provided to pupils enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. The instruction concerning Black history described in this subsection must cover, but is not limited to, historical Black events, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The contributions made by Black individuals in government, the arts, humanities, and sciences and the contributions of Black communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States. (b) The history of Black communities in this state and the Midwest, which must include, but is not limited to, coverage of past policies that were discriminatory toward Black communities. (c) The contributions of Black communities toward advancing civil rights from the nineteenth century onward. (2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt or develop and make available to school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for the development of the 1 unit of instruction described in subsection (1). Both of the following apply to the instructional materials described in this subsection: (a) The instructional materials must be in accordance with the state social studies standards adopted by the state board of education. (b) The instructional materials must be created with input from Black cultural centers, community members, experts, and scholars. (3) The superintendent of each school district or intermediate school district or the chief administrator of each public school academy shall monitor the school district's, intermediate school district's, or public school academy's compliance with this section. (4) Subject to other state laws concerning virtual courses or online instruction, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy may meet the requirements under this section through the provision of a virtual course or online instruction. (5) The instruction in Black history described in this section must be appropriate for pupils of all races, religions, nationalities, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and pupils who are English language learners. The instruction must not reflect or promote, directly or indirectly, any bias, bigotry, or discrimination against any person or group of persons protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall allow flexibility to school instructors to incorporate each unit of instruction into preexisting units and lesson plans, including those aligned with units of instruction for curricula in addition to and other than social studies. (7) As used in this section, "1 unit of instruction" means the minimum amount of instructional time determined by the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, as applicable, implementing the instruction. Sec. 1164a. (1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of each school district and intermediate school district and board of directors of each public school academy shall ensure that 1 unit of instruction of age- and grade-appropriate instruction concerning Indigenous People history is incorporated into the history curriculum provided to pupils enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. The instruction concerning Indigenous People history described in this subsection must cover, but is not limited to, historical Indigenous People events, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The contributions made by individual Indigenous People in government, the arts, humanities, and sciences and the contributions of Indigenous People communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States. (b) The history of Indigenous People in this state and the Midwest, which must include, but is not limited to, coverage of past policies that were discriminatory toward Indigenous People. (c) The contributions of Indigenous People toward advancing civil rights from the nineteenth century onward. (2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt or develop and make available to school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for the development of the 1 unit of instruction described in subsection (1). Both of the following apply to the instructional materials described in this subsection: (a) The instructional materials must be in accordance with the state social studies standards adopted by the state board of education. (b) The instructional materials must be created with input from Indigenous People cultural centers, community members, experts, and scholars. (3) The superintendent of each school district or intermediate school district or the chief administrator of each public school academy shall monitor the school district's, intermediate school district's, or public school academy's compliance with this section. (4) Subject to other state laws concerning virtual courses or online instruction, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy may meet the requirements under this section through the provision of a virtual course or online instruction. (5) The instruction in Indigenous People history described in this section must be appropriate for pupils of all races, religions, nationalities, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and pupils who are English language learners. The instruction must not reflect or promote, directly or indirectly, any bias, bigotry, or discrimination against any person or group of persons protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall allow flexibility to school instructors to incorporate each unit of instruction into preexisting units and lesson plans, including those aligned with units of instruction for curricula in addition to and other than social studies. (7) As used in this section, "1 unit of instruction" means the minimum amount of instructional time determined by the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, as applicable, implementing the instruction. Sec. 1164c. (1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of each school district and intermediate school district and board of directors of each public school academy shall ensure that 1 unit of instruction of age- and grade-appropriate instruction concerning Asian American and Pacific Islander history is incorporated into the history curriculum provided to pupils enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. The instruction concerning Asian American and Pacific Islander history described in this subsection must cover, but is not limited to, historical Asian American and Pacific Islander events, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The contributions made by individual Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders in government, the arts, humanities, and sciences and the contributions of Asian American and Pacific Islander communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States. (b) The history of Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders in this state and the Midwest, which must include, but is not limited to, coverage of past policies that were discriminatory toward Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders. (c) The contributions of Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders toward advancing civil rights from the nineteenth century onward. (2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt or develop and make available to school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for the development of the 1 unit of instruction described in subsection (1). Both of the following apply to the instructional materials described in this subsection: (a) The instructional materials must be in accordance with the state social studies standards adopted by the state board of education. (b) The instructional materials must be created with input from Asian American and Pacific Islander cultural centers, community members, experts, and scholars. (3) The superintendent of each school district or intermediate school district or the chief administrator of each public school academy shall monitor the school district's, intermediate school district's, or public school academy's compliance with this section. (4) Subject to other state laws concerning virtual courses or online instruction, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy may meet the requirements under this section through the provision of a virtual course or online instruction. (5) The instruction in Asian American and Pacific Islander history described in this section must be appropriate for pupils of all races, religions, nationalities, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and pupils who are English language learners. The instruction must not reflect or promote, directly or indirectly, any bias, bigotry, or discrimination against any person or group of persons protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall allow flexibility to school instructors to incorporate each unit of instruction into preexisting units and lesson plans, including those aligned with units of instruction for curricula in addition to and other than social studies. (7) As used in this section, "1 unit of instruction" means the minimum amount of instructional time determined by the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, as applicable, implementing the instruction. Sec. 1164d. (1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of each school district and intermediate school district and board of directors of each public school academy shall ensure that 1 unit of instruction of age- and grade-appropriate instruction concerning Latin American, Hispanic American, and Caribbean American history is incorporated into the history curriculum provided to pupils enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. The instruction concerning Latin American, Hispanic American, and Caribbean American history described in this subsection must cover, but is not limited to, historical Latin American, Hispanic American, and Caribbean American events, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The contributions made by individual Latin Americans, Hispanic Americans, and Caribbean Americans in government, the arts, humanities, and sciences and the contributions of Latin American, Hispanic American, and Caribbean American communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States. (b) The history of Latin Americans, Hispanic Americans, and Caribbean Americans in this state and the Midwest. (c) The contributions of Latin Americans, Hispanic Americans, and Caribbean Americans toward advancing civil rights from the nineteenth century onward. (2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt or develop and make available to school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for the development of the 1 unit of instruction described in subsection (1). Both of the following apply to the instructional materials described in this subsection: (a) The instructional materials must be in accordance with the state social studies standards adopted by the state board of education. (b) The instructional materials must be created with input from Latin American, Hispanic American, and Caribbean American cultural centers, community members, experts, and scholars. (3) The superintendent of each school district or intermediate school district or the chief administrator of each public school academy shall monitor the school district's, intermediate school district's, or public school academy's compliance with this section. (4) Subject to other state laws concerning virtual courses or online instruction, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy may meet the requirements under this section through the provision of a virtual course or online instruction. (5) The instruction in Latin American, Hispanic American, and Caribbean American history described in this section must be appropriate for pupils of all races, religions, nationalities, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and pupils who are English language learners. The instruction must not reflect or promote, directly or indirectly, any bias, bigotry, or discrimination against any person or group of persons protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall allow flexibility to school instructors to incorporate each unit of instruction into preexisting units and lesson plans, including those aligned with units of instruction for curricula in addition to and other than social studies. (7) As used in this section, "1 unit of instruction" means the minimum amount of instructional time determined by the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, as applicable, implementing the instruction. Sec. 1164e. (1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of each school district and intermediate school district and board of directors of each public school academy shall ensure that 1 unit of instruction of age- and grade-appropriate instruction concerning Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean American history is incorporated into the history curriculum provided to pupils enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. The instruction concerning Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean American history described in this subsection must cover, but is not limited to, historical Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean American events, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The contributions made by individual Middle Easterners, North Africans, and Chaldean Americans in government, the arts, humanities, and sciences and the contributions of Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean American communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States. (b) The history of Middle Easterners, North Africans, and Chaldean Americans in this state and the Midwest. (c) The contributions of Middle Easterners, North Africans, and Chaldean Americans toward advancing civil rights from the nineteenth century onward. (2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt or develop and make available to school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for the development of the 1 unit of instruction described in subsection (1). Both of the following apply to the instructional materials described in this subsection: (a) The instructional materials must be in accordance with the state social studies standards adopted by the state board of education. (b) The instructional materials must be created with input from Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean American cultural centers, community members, experts, and scholars. (3) The superintendent of each school district or intermediate school district or the chief administrator of each public school academy shall monitor the school district's, intermediate school district's, or public school academy's compliance with this section. (4) Subject to other state laws concerning virtual courses or online instruction, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy may meet the requirements under this section through the provision of a virtual course or online instruction. (5) The instruction in Middle Eastern, North African, and Chaldean American history described in this section must be appropriate for pupils of all races, religions, nationalities, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and pupils who are English language learners. The instruction must not reflect or promote, directly or indirectly, any bias, bigotry, or discrimination against any person or group of persons protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall allow flexibility to school instructors to incorporate each unit of instruction into preexisting units and lesson plans, including those aligned with units of instruction for curricula in addition to and other than social studies. (7) As used in this section, "1 unit of instruction" means the minimum amount of instructional time determined by the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, as applicable, implementing the instruction. Sec. 1164f. (1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of each school district and intermediate school district and board of directors of each public school academy shall ensure that 1 unit of instruction of age- and grade-appropriate instruction concerning Jewish American history is incorporated into the history curriculum provided to pupils enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. The instruction concerning Jewish American history described in this subsection must cover, but is not limited to, historical Jewish American events, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The contributions made by individual Jewish Americans in government, the arts, humanities, and sciences and the contributions of Jewish American communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States. (b) The history of Jewish Americans in this state and the Midwest. (c) The contributions of Jewish Americans toward advancing civil rights from the nineteenth century onward. (2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt or develop and make available to school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for the development of the 1 unit of instruction described in subsection (1). Both of the following apply to the instructional materials described in this subsection: (a) The instructional materials must be in accordance with the state social studies standards adopted by the state board of education. (b) The instructional materials must be created with input from Jewish American cultural centers, community members, experts, and scholars. (3) The superintendent of each school district or intermediate school district or the chief administrator of each public school academy shall monitor the school district's, intermediate school district's, or public school academy's compliance with this section. (4) Subject to other state laws concerning virtual courses or online instruction, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy may meet the requirements under this section through the provision of a virtual course or online instruction. (5) The instruction in Jewish American history described in this section must be appropriate for pupils of all races, religions, nationalities, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and pupils who are English language learners. The instruction must not reflect or promote, directly or indirectly, any bias, bigotry, or discrimination against any person or group of persons protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall allow flexibility to school instructors to incorporate each unit of instruction into preexisting units and lesson plans, including those aligned with units of instruction for curricula in addition to and other than social studies. (7) As used in this section, "1 unit of instruction" means the minimum amount of instructional time determined by the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, as applicable, implementing the instruction. Sec. 1164g. (1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of each school district and intermediate school district and board of directors of each public school academy shall ensure that 1 unit of instruction of age- and grade-appropriate instruction concerning European American history is incorporated into the history curriculum provided to pupils enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. The instruction concerning European American history described in this subsection must cover, but is not limited to, historical European American events, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The contributions made by individual European Americans in government, the arts, humanities, and sciences and the contributions of European American communities to the economic, cultural, social, and political development of the United States. (b) The history of European Americans in this state and the Midwest. (c) The contributions of European Americans toward advancing civil rights from the nineteenth century onward. (2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt or develop and make available to school districts, intermediate school districts, and public school academies instructional materials that may be used as guidelines for the development of the 1 unit of instruction described in subsection (1). Both of the following apply to the instructional materials described in this subsection: (a) The instructional materials must be in accordance with the state social studies standards adopted by the state board of education. (b) The instructional materials must be created with input from European American cultural centers, community members, experts, and scholars. (3) The superintendent of each school district or intermediate school district or the chief administrator of each public school academy shall monitor the school district's, intermediate school district's, or public school academy's compliance with this section. (4) Subject to other state laws concerning virtual courses or online instruction, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy may meet the requirements under this section through the provision of a virtual course or online instruction. (5) The instruction in European American history described in this section must be appropriate for pupils of all races, religions, nationalities, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and pupils who are English language learners. The instruction must not reflect or promote, directly or indirectly, any bias, bigotry, or discrimination against any person or group of persons protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall allow flexibility to school instructors to incorporate each unit of instruction into preexisting units and lesson plans, including those aligned with units of instruction for curricula in addition to and other than social studies. (7) As used in this section, "1 unit of instruction" means the minimum amount of instructional time determined by the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy, as applicable, implementing the instruction. Sec. 1278. (1) In addition to the requirements for accreditation under section 1280 specified in that section, if the board of a school district wants all of the schools of the school district to be accredited under section 1280, the board shall provide to all pupils attending public school in the district a core academic curriculum in compliance with subsection (3) in each of the curricular areas specified in the state board recommended model core academic curriculum content standards developed under subsection (2). The state board model core academic curriculum content standards shall must encompass academic and cognitive instruction only. For purposes of this section, the state board model core academic curriculum content standards shall must not include attitudes, beliefs, or value systems that are not essential in the legal, economic, and social structure of our society and to the personal and social responsibility of citizens of our society. (2) Recommended model core academic curriculum content standards shall must be developed and periodically updated by the state board, shall must be in the form of knowledge and skill content standards that are recommended as state standards for adoption by public schools in local curriculum formulation and adoption, and shall must be distributed to each school district in the state. The recommended model core academic curriculum content standards shall must set forth desired learning objectives in math, science, reading, history, geography, economics, American government, and writing for all children at each stage of schooling and be based upon on the "Michigan K-12 Program Standards of Quality" to ensure that high academic standards, academic skills, and academic subject matters are built into the instructional goals of all school districts for all children. The state board shall ensure that the recommended model core academic curriculum content standards for history for grades 8 to 12 include learning objectives concerning genocide, including, but not limited to, the Holocaust and the Armenian Genocide. The state board shall ensure that the recommended core academic curriculum content standards for history include age- and grade-appropriate instruction regarding institutional and societal discrimination and oppression against marginalized populations protected from discrimination under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. The state board also shall ensure that the state assessment program and the Michigan merit examination are based on the state recommended model core curriculum content standards, are testing only for proficiency in basic and advanced academic skills and academic subject matter, and are not used to measure pupils' values or attitudes. (3) The board of each school district, considering academic curricular objectives defined and recommended pursuant to subsection (2), shall do both of the following: (a) Establish a core academic curriculum for its pupils at the elementary, middle, and secondary school levels. The core academic curriculum shall must define academic objectives to be achieved by all pupils and shall must be based upon on the school district's educational mission, long-range pupil goals, and pupil performance objectives. The core academic curriculum may vary from the model core academic curriculum content standards recommended by the state board pursuant to subsection (2). (b) After consulting with teachers and school building administrators, determine the aligned instructional program for delivering the core academic curriculum and identify the courses and programs in which the core academic curriculum will be taught. (4) The board may supplement the core academic curriculum by providing instruction through additional classes and programs. (5) For all pupils, the subjects or courses, and the delivery of those including special assistance, that constitute the curriculum the pupils engage in shall assure must ensure the pupils have a realistic opportunity to learn all subjects and courses required by the district's core academic curriculum. A subject or course required by the core academic curriculum pursuant to subsection (3) shall must be provided to all pupils in the school district by a school district, a consortium of school districts, or a consortium of 1 or more school districts and 1 or more intermediate school districts. (6) To the extent practicable, the state board may adopt or develop academic objective-oriented high standards for knowledge and life skills, and a recommended core academic curriculum, for special education pupils for whom it may not be realistic or desirable to expect achievement of initial mastery of the state board recommended model core academic content standards objectives or of a high school diploma. (7) The state board shall make available to all nonpublic schools in this state, as a resource for their consideration, the model core academic curriculum content standards developed for public schools pursuant to subsection (2) for the purpose of assisting the governing body of a nonpublic school in developing its core academic curriculum. (8) Excluding special education pupils, pupils having a learning disability, and pupils with extenuating circumstances as determined by school officials, a pupil who does not score satisfactorily on the fourth or seventh grade state assessment program reading test shall must be provided special assistance reasonably expected to enable the pupil to bring his or her the pupil's reading skills to grade level within 12 months. (9) Any course that would have been considered a nonessential elective course under Snyder v Charlotte School Dist, Snyder v Charlotte School Dist, 421 Mich 517 (1984), on April 13, 1990 shall must continue to be offered to resident pupils of nonpublic schools on a shared time basis. (10) As used in this section, "Armenian Genocide", "genocide", and "Holocaust" mean those terms as defined in section 1168.